California statutes. Vehicle Code
In any criminal proceeding in which ownership, possession, or use of a motor vehicle is an issue, a copy certified by the department as its record of title on file, or with the official custodian of those documents of another state, shall be admissible as evidence of ownership of the motor vehicle. Upon the introduction of evidence that the legal owner of a motor vehicle is not named in the certificate of title or that use or possession was with the consent or authority of the owner, a reasonable continuance shall be granted any party to enable the owner of the vehicle to be brought into court to testify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6151.

A party to a proceeding described in Section 6150 may provide notice to the opposing party that a showing of need will be made at the arraignment or at any other pretrial hearing, and upon the proof of that notice and the showing of need, the court shall take testimony from the owner or person in control of the motor vehicle which shall be admissible at trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6152.

At any hearing, including, but not limited to, a scheduled trial date, involving a proceeding described in Section 6150, upon a showing of need, the court shall order as a condition of granting a continuance that the testimony of a witness then present in court be taken and preserved for subsequent use at a trial or any other stage of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6153.

Where testimony is taken and preserved for use at trial or other stage of the proceeding pursuant to Sections 6151 and 6152, the witness shall be examined in open court by the party on whose behalf he or she is present, and the adverse party shall have the right of cross-examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6154.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inspection and Cancellation of Titles for Exported Vehicles [6160. - 6162.]

6160.

The Legislature finds and declares that when vehicles are exported and their title records are not amended to reflect exportation, it is conducive to vehicle theft and insurance fraud. The certificates of title issued by this state are used in insurance frauds in which a claimant falsely states that a vehicle has been stolen or uses that certificate to fraudulently procure insurance when in fact the vehicle has previously been exported from the United States. In the interest of the general welfare of the people of this state, and in order to combat vehicle theft and insurance fraud, it is necessary that the department’s record of title reflect the fact that a vehicle is being exported either temporarily or permanently, based upon the true owner’s declaration prior to exportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following provisions and definitions apply to the following terms:

(a) “Certified record of permanent exportation” shall include all of the following:

(1) The titled owner’s name and address.

(2) A description of the vehicle, including year, make, body type, vehicle identification number, license registration number, and state registration.

(3) The destination of vehicle.

(4) The purpose of export, whether sale, lease, or personal use.

(b) “Declaration that the vehicle will not be permanently located outside the United States” shall include the items specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and shall also state the period of time for which it is anticipated that the vehicle will be outside the United States.

(c) “Export” means the shipping or transporting of a vehicle out of the United States by means other than its own power or that of a vehicle drawing or towing it.

(d) “Owner” means the owner of record indicated in a certificate of title issued by this state and includes an agent of that owner acting under a valid power of attorney executed by an owner.

(e) “Title” means the certificate of ownership issued by the department pursuant to Section 4450, but excludes a salvage certificate, as described in Section 11515, a nonrepairable vehicle certificate, as defined in Section 432, and an acquisition bill of sale, as described in Section 11519.

(f) “Vehicle” means every device designed for transportation of persons or property upon land, for which a certificate of title is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.   See similar section (except for subd. (e)) added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.

For the purposes of this act, the term:

(a) “Certified record of permanent exportation” shall include the following:

(1) Titled owner’s name and address.

(2) Description of the vehicle, including year, make, body type, vehicle identification number, license registration number, and state registration.

(3) Destination of vehicle.

(4) Purpose of export, whether sale, lease, or personal use.

(b) “Declaration that the vehicle will not be permanently located outside the United States” shall include the items specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and shall also state the period of time for which it is anticipated that the vehicle will be outside the United States.

(c) “Export” means the shipping or transporting of a vehicle out of the United States by means other than its own power or that of a vehicle drawing or towing it.

(d) “Owner” means the owner of record indicated in a certificate of title issued by this state and includes an agent of that owner acting under a valid power of attorney executed by an owner.

(e) “Title” means the certificate of ownership issued by the department pursuant to Section 4450, but excludes a salvage certificate as described in Section 11515 and an acquisition bill of sale as described in Section 11519.

(f) “Vehicle” means every device designed for transportation of persons or property upon land, for which a certificate of title is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.   See similar section (except for subd. (e)) added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

6162.

An owner of a vehicle who seeks to export a vehicle titled in this state shall appear at the department with the certificate of title to ascertain whether there are any liens of record outstanding and whether the person exporting the vehicle is the lawful owner. If the certificate of title is found to be in proper order and no unsatisfied lien appears, the department shall enter into its record of title that the vehicle is intended for permanent exportation from the United States. If the owner certifies by filing a declaration with the department that the vehicle will not be permanently located outside the United States, and that he or she intends to return the vehicle to the United States, the department shall enter into its record of title a declaration that the vehicle will not be permanently located outside the United States until notification by the owner that the vehicle has been returned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Return of Stolen Motor Vehicle Retained as Evidence [6171. - 6172.]

6171.

When criminal charges have been filed involving a motor vehicle alleged to have been stolen and the vehicle is in the custody of a peace officer for evidentiary purposes, it shall be held in custody or, if a request for its release from custody is made, until the prosecutor has notified the defendant or his or her attorney of that request and both the prosecution and defense have been afforded a reasonable opportunity for an examination of the motor vehicle to determine its true value and to produce or reproduce, by photographs or other identifying techniques, legally sufficient evidence for introduction at trial or other criminal proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6172.

Upon expiration of a reasonable time for the completion of the examination, which in no event shall exceed 30 days from the date of service of the notice of request or return of the motor vehicle as provided in Section 6171, the property shall be released to the person making that request after satisfactory proof of the person’s entitlement to the possession. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon ex parte application by either party with notice to the other, the court may grant additional time for the examination or order retention of the motor vehicle if it determines that either is necessary to further the interests of justice; however, this provision shall not be construed to require a noticed hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Filing Instruments Evidencing Liens or Encumbrances [6300. - 6303.]

6300.

Except as provided in Sections 5905, 5907, and 5908, no security interest in any vehicle registered under this code, irrespective of whether the registration was effected prior or subsequent to the creation of the security interest, is perfected until the secured party or his or her successor or assignee has deposited, either physically or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 1801.1, with the department, at its office in Sacramento, or at any other office as may be designated by the director, a properly endorsed certificate of ownership to the vehicle subject to the security interest showing the secured party as legal owner if the vehicle is then registered under this code, or, if the vehicle is not so registered, an application in usual form for an original registration, together with an application for registration of the secured party as legal owner, and upon payment of the fees as provided in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 440, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

When the secured party, his or her successor, or his or her assignee, has deposited, either physically or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 1801.1, with the department a properly endorsed certificate of ownership showing the secured party as legal owner or an application in usual form for an original registration, together with an application for registration of the secured party as legal owner, the deposit constitutes perfection of the security interest and the rights of all persons in the vehicle shall be subject to the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, but the vehicle subject to the security interest shall be subject to a lien for services and materials as provided in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 3068) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 440, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

Upon the deposit of an application for registration of a secured party as legal owner and upon the payment of the fees as provided in this code, the department shall register the secured party, his successor or assignee as legal owner in the manner provided for the registration of motor vehicles under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

Except as provided in Sections 5905, 5907 and 5908, the method provided in this chapter for perfecting a security interest on a vehicle registered under this code is exclusive, but the effect of such perfection, and the creation, attachment, priority and validity of such security interest shall be governed by the Uniform Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Permits to Nonresident Owners [6700. - 8204.]



  ARTICLE 1. Exemption of Nonresidents [6700. - 6703.]

6700.

(a) Except as provided in Section 6700.2, the owner of any vehicle of a type otherwise subject to registration under this code, other than a commercial vehicle registered in a foreign jurisdiction, may operate the vehicle in this state until gainful employment is accepted in this state or until residency is established in this state, whichever occurs first, if the vehicle displays valid license plates and has a valid registration issued to the owner, and the owner was a resident of that state at the time of issuance. Application to register the vehicle shall be made within 20 days after gainful employment is accepted in this state or residency is established in this state.

(b) A nonresident owner of a vehicle, otherwise exempt from registration pursuant to this section or Section 6700.2, may operate or permit operation of the vehicle in this state without registering the vehicle in this state if the vehicle is registered in the place of residence of the owner and displays upon it valid license plates issued by that place. This exemption does not apply if the nonresident owner rents, leases, lends, or otherwise furnishes the vehicle to a California resident for regular use on the highways of this state, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 4000.4.

(c) Any resident who operates upon a highway of this state a vehicle owned by a nonresident who furnished the vehicle to the resident operator for his or her regular use within this state, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 4000.4, shall cause the vehicle to be registered in California within 20 days after its first operation within this state by the resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6700.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may issue an in-transit permit to a resident of a foreign country not more than 30 days before or after the foreign resident purchases a new motor vehicle in California which was manufactured in the United States. The permit authorizes the operation of the vehicle for which it is purchased for up to 30 consecutive days after the first date of operation, and is in lieu of any other registration requirements, including, but not limited to, fees or taxes required by this code or the Revenue and Taxation Code. The seller shall ship or drive the vehicle out of this country before or at the end of 30 consecutive days from the first date of operation, or thereafter shall be subject to, and shall be required to pay, all charges and registration requirements for vehicles subject to registration in this state. In addition, if the vehicle is not so removed from this country, the department shall assess, and the seller shall be required to pay, a penalty of 20 percent of the vehicle registration and license fees and sales tax due upon the vehicle becoming subject to registration.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to commercial vehicles.

(c) Proof of residency in a foreign country for purposes of this section shall be established through the presentation of a valid visa, passport, or other suitable documentation, as determined by the department.

(d) A fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be paid to the department for each in-transit permit issued.

(e) A permit issued under this section shall be displayed in the manner permitted by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 26708.

(f) The permit issued by the department shall clearly and prominently indicate the date of expiration of the authorized in-transit driving privilege.

(g) No California certificate of ownership shall be issued.

(h) A manufacturer’s certificate of origin shall prominently indicate that the certificate is valid for transfer of ownership to the purchaser only outside of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(i) Notwithstanding Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold to a foreign purchaser under the conditions specified in Section 6366.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall reimburse the retailer for an amount equal to the sales tax and all registration charges and fees, and a penalty of 20 percent of those taxes, charges, and fees if the conditions of the in-transit permit are not met, as specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 762.)
-------------------------------------------

6700.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4000.4, subdivision (a) of Section 6700, or Section 6702, a nonresident daily commuter may operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The motor vehicle is a passenger vehicle or a commercial vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight with not more than two axles of the type commonly referred to as a pickup truck.

(2) The motor vehicle is used regularly to transport passengers on the highways of this state principally between, and to and from, the place of residence in a contiguous state and the place of employment in this state by the owner of the motor vehicle and for no other business purpose.

(3) The motor vehicle is not used in the course of a business within this state, including the transportation of property other than incidental personal property between, and to or from, the place of residence in a contiguous state and the place of employment of the motor vehicle owner in this state.

(4) Nothing in paragraphs (2) and (3) prohibits a nonresident daily commuter operating a motor vehicle that displays currently valid external vehicle identification indicia and who possess a corresponding identification card issued pursuant to Section 6700.25 from using that vehicle for other lawful purposes.

(b) The exception to registration of a motor vehicle under the conditions specified in this section does not supersede any other exception to registration under other conditions provided by law.

(c) This section does not apply to a resident of a foreign country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 825, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6700.25.

(a) The department shall provide a nonresident daily commuter with external vehicle identification indicia and a corresponding identification card, upon application therefor and completion of the form required by Section 6700.3, which indicia and card shall be valid for a period of two years. A vehicle shall be exempt from Sections 4000.4 and 6700 when operated with the requisite indicia and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only to residents and vehicles of residents of a contiguous state which has enacted laws that provide reciprocal privileges to California residents who are employed in the contiguous state. Subdivision (a) does not apply to residents of foreign countries.

(c) Subdivision (a) applies only to the vehicles specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6700.2.

(d) Subdivision (a) applies only to vehicles which are licensed in a foreign jurisdiction that are used to commute into California to a destination within a corridor in this state that parallels the border between California and the contiguous state and extends not more than 35 air miles into California from the border at any point. The privilege accorded by subdivision (a) shall be revoked by operation of the vehicle for commuter purposes beyond that 35-mile corridor.

(e) The department shall charge a service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) for each vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6700.3.

(a) An application by a nonresident daily commuter for indicia and an identification card pursuant to Section 6700.25 shall be filed with the department.

(b) The department shall prescribe a form to be completed by the applicant which shall include all of the following information:

(1) The vehicle license number and the vehicle identification number (VIN) of the vehicle that will display the nonresident daily commuter indicia.

(2) The name of the registered owner of the vehicle that will display the indicia.

(3) A statement that the applicant is a nonresident daily commuter as defined in Section 435.5.

(4) A statement that the indicia will be displayed upon a qualified vehicle as specified in Section 6700.4.

(5) A statement that the place of employment of the nonresident daily commuter is within the 35-mile corridor specified in subdivision (d) of Section 6700.25.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1090, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6700.4.

A nonresident daily commuter indicia shall be displayed in a location on the vehicle which is clearly visible and adjacent to the rear license plate. The corresponding nonresident daily commuter identification card shall be carried at all times in the assigned vehicle and shall be presented to any California peace officer upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1090, Sec. 6.   Effective September 27, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

(a) Any nonresident owner of a vehicle registered in a foreign state who is a member or spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty within this state, and any resident owner of a vehicle registered in a foreign state who is a member or spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States returning from active duty in a foreign state, may operate the vehicle in this state without securing California registration after satisfying all of the following requirements:

(1) The license plates displayed on the vehicle are valid plates issued by a foreign jurisdiction.

(2) The vehicle registration and license plates are issued to the military person or spouse of the military person.

(3) The vehicle registration and license plates were issued by the foreign jurisdiction where the military person was last regularly assigned and stationed for duty by military orders or a jurisdiction claimed by the nonresident military person as the permanent state of residence.

(4) If the vehicle is a motor vehicle, the owner or driver has in force one of the forms of financial responsibility specified in Section 16021.

(b) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), military orders do not include military orders for leave, for temporary duty, or for any other assignment of any nature requiring the military person’s presence outside the foreign jurisdiction where the owner was regularly assigned and stationed for duty.

(c) This section applies to all vehicles owned by the military person or spouse except any commercial vehicle used in any business manner wherein the military person or spouse receives compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

Every nonresident, including any foreign corporation, having an established place of business within this state, and regularly using a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, shall immediately register the vehicle upon entry into this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1322, Sec. 7.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.

Any person entering California following discharge from the armed forces of the United States is exempted from registration of passenger vehicles, trailer coaches, and utility trailers only, as provided for and under the conditions prescribed in Section 6700.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1322, Sec. 7.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Foreign Commercial Vehicles [6850. - 6854.]

6850.

A nonresident owner of any foreign commercial vehicle shall register the vehicle in this state and pay the fees applicable thereto under this code, except as provided in this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 8000), and except in the event the vehicle is lawfully registered as a private passenger vehicle in the foreign jurisdiction in which the owner has residence, in which case Section 6700 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1322, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

6852.

The nonresident owner of a foreign vehicle shall be granted such privileges and freedom from registration and payment of fees imposed by this code, or Part 5 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, commencing at Section 10701, as the foreign jurisdiction in which the foreign commercial vehicle is registered or licensed grants to like vehicles registered under this code or as provided in agreements, arrangements, or declarations made under Article 3, commencing at Section 8000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6853.

Any vehicle owned by a nonresident owner not registered under this code, which vehicle is leased or rented to a user having an established place of business or residence in this State, for use on the highways of this State shall be subject to registration either by the owner or lessee of the vehicle, unless the vehicle is exempted from registration by the provisions of this division or under any agreement, arrangement, or declaration made pursuant to Article 3, commencing at Section 8000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6854.

(a) Any owner or lessor of a commercial vehicle with primary registration and plates issued in a foreign jurisdiction which does not grant reciprocal privileges to California owners of commercial vehicles shall submit to the department proof of financial responsibility issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in California. This section shall apply only to commercial vehicles having an unladen weight of over 7,000 pounds that are used in the transportation of property in the conduct of a business.

(b) As an alternative to the requirements of subdivision (a), proof of financial responsibility may be met by submitting to the department either of the following:

(1) A certificate of registration as a foreign motor carrier or foreign motor private carrier issued by the Interstate Commerce Commission under Part 1171 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Contractual documents showing to the satisfaction of the department that a trailer or semitrailer subject to registration under Part 1171 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations will be towed by a truck or truck tractor operated by a motor carrier having highway carrier operating authority issued by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reciprocity Agreements [8000. - 8001.]

8000.

The director, or his or her designee, may enter into agreements with foreign jurisdictions that provide for the exemption of fees for commercial vehicles if the foreign jurisdictions provide equivalent exemptions to vehicles registered in this state. The agreements shall be applicable to vehicles that are properly licensed and registered in the foreign jurisdictions. The director, or his or her designee, may also enter into agreements that provide for the exemption of regulatory fees which are, or may be, imposed, by the Public Utilities Code or the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 315, Sec. 9.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

The director, or his or her designee, is authorized to examine the legal requirements of commercial vehicle registration fee statutes of foreign jurisdictions which grant reciprocal privileges to out-of-state vehicles, but which do not authorize negotiations or execution of agreements. After examination of the statutes, the director, or his or her designee, may declare the exemptions, benefits, and privileges that commercial vehicles registered in foreign jurisdictions shall be entitled to in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 315, Sec. 10.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Apportioned Registration [8050. - 8058.]

8050.

The Legislature declares that in enacting this article, it adheres to the principle that each state should have the freedom to develop the kind of highway user tax structure that it determines to be most appropriate to itself, that the method of taxation of interstate vehicles should not be a determining factor in developing its user tax structure and that annual taxes or other taxes of the fixed fee type which are not imposed on a basis that reflects the amount of highway use should be apportioned among the states on the basis of vehicle miles traveled within each of the states. If the department determines that apportionment of the taxes on the basis of vehicle miles for a particular fleet of vehicles is impractical, the department may require the taxes on the fleet to be apportioned on an equivalent basis other than miles, as determined by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 533, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

(a) The director, or his or her designee, may, on behalf of the state, enter into, and become, a member of the International Registration Plan Agreement developed by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. The director, or his or her designee, may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the International Registration Plan or other apportioned registration agreements entered into under the authority of this article.

(b) In administering the International Registration Plan, the state may collect all appropriate registration and license fees due other jurisdictions. Foreign jurisdictions that are members of the agreement shall be authorized
 to collect all appropriate registration and license fees due to the State of California, and remit the fees to this state pursuant to the terms of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 315, Sec. 13.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.

Provisions of this code which specify and govern application filing, fee assignment, penalty assessment, and issuance of license plates and registration certificates, shall be applicable to vehicles registered pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 533, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8054.

(a) Upon the application for transfer of ownership of a fleet of vehicles apportionately registered pursuant to this article, the department shall permit registration in the new owners name without reassessing the registration and vehicle license fees, if the application of the new ownership is for the same fleet interstate operation as the previous owner.

(b) The new owner, lessee, or their designee, shall certify the declared gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or vehicles on a single form for all commercial motor vehicles registered in the fleet owner’s or lessee’s name. The department shall reassess the weight fees if the declared gross vehicle weight is increased. The weight fees will be assessed at a prorated rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 40.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

8055.

This article does not apply to any owner or lessee of a commercial vehicle with primary registration and license plates issued in a foreign jurisdiction which does not grant reciprocity or apportioned registration to residents of this state owning commercial vehicles while operating within that foreign jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 533, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8056.

Any application filed pursuant to this article which contains vehicles powered by diesel fuel shall include information concerning any diesel fuel tax permit issued by the Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 533, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8057.

Any person issued fleet registration pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301) of Chapter 1 or this article shall:

(a) Maintain fleet records that support the reported mileage, cost, and declared gross or combined gross vehicle weight of all vehicles. Any registrant whose application for apportioned registration has been accepted shall preserve the mileage records on which the application is based, including copies of all permits, for a period of three years after the close of the registration year. Vehicle cost and declared gross or combined gross weight records shall be retained for four years after the close of the registration year in which the vehicle was deleted.

(b) Make fleet records available to the department at its request for audit to verify the accuracy of the records. In the event the records are not made available within 30 days of the request, the department may assess full California fees and penalties and may suspend or cancel apportioned registration privileges. The registrant may be required to reimburse the department auditor per diem and travel expenses under certain conditions as determined by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 758, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8058.

(a) The department shall charge interest on any underpaid fees due under this article, at the rate of 1 percent per month of the underpaid portion of the fees, commencing on the date the underpaid portion of the fees were originally due and accruing monthly until paid.

(b) Interest charged under subdivision (a) shall continue to accumulate during any disputation of the underpaid fees or any hearing regarding the underpaid fees. During any disputation or hearing, the registrant may pay the underpaid fees and other charges to avoid additional interest charges and may request a refund of any overpaid fees after final review.

(c) For any underpaid fees, the department may impose a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) or 10 percent of the underpaid fees, whichever is greater, commencing on the date the underpaid fees were determined to be due.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “underpaid fees” include additional vehicle registration, weight, and license fees found to be due to this state.

(e) The director shall have discretion to apply subdivision (b) of Section 9562 instead of subdivision (c) of this section.

(f) The penalty structure set forth in Sections 9554 and 9554.5 shall apply in place of the provisions of this section in those cases where there is a violation of Section 4000, 4000.4, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4004.5, or 4156 for commercial registration that is not apportioned pursuant to Section 8050.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 758, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Program [8100. - 8104.]

8100.

An application for apportioned registration received on and after January 1, 2008, and filed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) shall contain the following information:

(a) The United States Department of Transportation Number issued to the person responsible for the safe operation of each vehicle being registered.

(b) The taxpayer identification number corresponding to the United States Department of Transportation number provided in the apportioned registration application. The taxpayer identification number may consist of the federal employer identification number or the social security number, as applicable.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the taxpayer identification number provided pursuant to this section is confidential and shall not be disclosed by the department except to law enforcement or a federal agency, or as required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.

In addition to the reasons specified in Section 4750 or 4751, the department shall refuse an application for apportioned registration for the following grounds:

(a) The applicant has failed to furnish the department with information required in the application under Section 8100.

(b) The person responsible for the safety of the vehicle or fleet is prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

(a) In addition to the reasons specified in Section 8800, the department may suspend the apportioned registration of a vehicle or a fleet, when the person responsible for the safety of the vehicle or a fleet of vehicles is prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency.

(b) Whenever the department suspends the apportioned registration of a vehicle or a fleet pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may refuse the issuance of vehicle registration as authorized pursuant to Section 4751.

(c) Whenever the department suspends the apportioned registration under subdivision (a), the department shall furnish the person responsible for the vehicle or fleet with written notice of the suspension.

(d) When an apportioned registration is suspended pursuant to this section, and that suspension is based wholly or in part on the failure of the person to maintain a vehicle or a fleet in safe operating condition, the person to whom the registration was issued shall not lease, or otherwise allow, another person to operate a vehicle that is subject to the suspension during the period of the suspension.

(e) A person shall not knowingly lease, operate, dispatch, or otherwise utilize a vehicle from another person whose apportioned registration is suspended, when that suspension is based wholly or in part on the failure of the person to maintain a vehicle or a fleet in safe operating condition.

(f) The apportioned registration of a vehicle or a fleet, that was suspended because the vehicle or fleet is prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency may be reinstated upon notification from the federal agency that the prohibition has been lifted.
